test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_O_NoExtra_skatig_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: giskatigimishinian
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: giskatigimishiniag
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: giskatigimishiniing
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: oskatigimishinaanan
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: oskatigimishinaanag
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: oskatigimishinaaning
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: oskatigimishiwaaan
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: oskatigimishiwaaag
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: oskatigimishiwaaing
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: oskatigimishinian
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: oskatigimishiniag
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: oskatigimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: niskatigimishibanan
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: niskatigimishibanag
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: niskatigimishibaning
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: niskatigimish***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: niskatigimish***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: niskatigimish***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: giskatigimishibanan
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: giskatigimishibanag
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: giskatigimishibaning
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: giskatigimish***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: giskatigimish***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: giskatigimish***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: oskatigimishibanan
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: oskatigimishibanag
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: oskatigimishibaning
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: oskatigimish***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: oskatigimish***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: oskatigimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niskatigiminaanibanan
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niskatigiminaanibanag
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niskatigiminaanibaning
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niskatigiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niskatigiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niskatigiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niskatigimiwaaibanan
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niskatigimiwaaibanag
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niskatigimiwaaibaning
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niskatigimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niskatigimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niskatigimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niskatigiminiibanan
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niskatigiminiibanag
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niskatigiminiibaning
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niskatigimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niskatigimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niskatigimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giskatigiminaanibanan
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giskatigiminaanibanag
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giskatigiminaanibaning
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giskatigiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giskatigiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giskatigiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giskatigimiwaaibanan
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giskatigimiwaaibanag
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giskatigimiwaaibaning
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giskatigimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giskatigimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giskatigimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giskatigiminiibanan
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giskatigiminiibanag
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giskatigiminiibaning
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giskatigimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giskatigimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giskatigimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oskatigiminaanibanan
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oskatigiminaanibanag
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oskatigiminaanibaning
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oskatigiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oskatigiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oskatigiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oskatigimiwaaibanan
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oskatigimiwaaibanag
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oskatigimiwaaibaning
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oskatigimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oskatigimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oskatigimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oskatigiminiibanan
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oskatigiminiibanag
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oskatigiminiibaning
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oskatigimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oskatigimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oskatigimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niskatigishinaanibanan
     +Px1skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niskatigishinaanibanag
     +Px1skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niskatigishinaanibaning
     +Px1skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niskatigishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niskatigishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niskatigishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niskatigishiwaaibanan
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niskatigishiwaaibanag
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niskatigishiwaaibaning
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niskatigishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niskatigishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niskatigishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niskatigishiniibanan
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niskatigishiniibanag
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niskatigishiniibaning
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niskatigishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niskatigishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niskatigishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giskatigishinaanibanan
     +Px2skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giskatigishinaanibanag
     +Px2skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giskatigishinaanibaning
     +Px2skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giskatigishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giskatigishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giskatigishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giskatigishiwaaibanan
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giskatigishiwaaibanag
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giskatigishiwaaibaning
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giskatigishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giskatigishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giskatigishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giskatigishiniibanan
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giskatigishiniibanag
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giskatigishiniibaning
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giskatigishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giskatigishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giskatigishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oskatigishinaanibanan
     +Px3skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oskatigishinaanibanag
     +Px3skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oskatigishinaanibaning
     +Px3skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oskatigishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oskatigishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oskatigishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oskatigishiwaaibanan
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oskatigishiwaaibanag
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oskatigishiwaaibaning
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oskatigishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oskatigishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oskatigishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oskatigishiniibanan
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oskatigishiniibanag
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oskatigishiniibaning
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oskatigishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oskatigishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oskatigishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: skatigensimishinaaniban
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: skatigensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: skatigensimishiwaaiban
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: skatigensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: skatigensimishiniiban
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: skatigensimishini***idig, idog***
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: skatigenhimishinaaniban
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: skatigenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: skatigenhimishiwaaiban
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: skatigenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: skatigenhimishiniiban
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: skatigenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: skatigensimishinaanan
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: skatigensimishinaanag
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: skatigensimishinaaning
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: skatigensimishiwaaan
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: skatigensimishiwaaag
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: skatigensimishiwaaing
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: skatigensimishinian
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: skatigensimishiniag
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: skatigensimishiniing
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: skatigenhimishinaanan
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: skatigenhimishinaanag
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: skatigenhimishinaaning
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: skatigenhimishiwaaan
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: skatigenhimishiwaaag
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: skatigenhimishiwaaing
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: skatigenhimishinian
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: skatigenhimishiniag
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: skatigenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: skatigensimishibanan
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: skatigensimishibanag
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: skatigensimishibaning
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: skatigensimish***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: skatigensimish***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: skatigensimish***idig, idog***ing
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: skatigenhimishibanan
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: skatigenhimishibanag
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: skatigenhimishibaning
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: skatigenhimish***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: skatigenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: skatigenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: skatigensiminaanibanan
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: skatigensiminaanibanag
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: skatigensiminaanibaning
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: skatigensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: skatigensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
